Washington statutes.
RCW 15.88.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Commission" means the Washington wine commission.

(2) "Director" means the director of agriculture or the director's duly appointed representative.

(3) "Department" means the department of agriculture.

(4) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation, trust, association, partnership, society, or any other organization of individuals.

(5) "Grower" means a person who has at least five acres in production of vinifera grapes.

(6) "Growers' association" means a nonprofit association of Washington producers of vinifera grapes, whether or not incorporated, which the director finds to comprise the interested persons affected by appointment of members of the commission or, if the director finds that no such association exists, a group of growers of vinifera grapes within the state identified by the director as fairly representing growers of vinifera grapes within the state.

(7) "Vinifera grapes" means the agricultural product commonly known as VITIS VINIFERA and those hybrid of VITIS VINIFERA which have predominantly the character of VITIS VINIFERA.

(8) "Producer" means any person or other entity which grows within the state vinifera grapes or any person or other entity licensed under Title 66 RCW to produce within the state wine made predominantly from vinifera grapes.

(9) "Wine producer" means any person or other entity licensed under Title 66 RCW to produce within the state wine from vinifera grapes.

(10) "Eastern Washington" means that portion of the state lying east of the Cascade mountain range.

(11) "Western Washington" means that portion of the state lying west of the Cascade mountain range.

(12) "Wine" for the purposes of this section shall be as defined in RCW 66.04.010.

(13) "Wine institute" means a nonprofit association of Washington wine producers, whether or not incorporated, which the director finds to comprise interested persons affected by appointment of members of the commission or, if the director finds that no such association exists, a group composed of all such producers identified as actively engaged in the production of wine within the state.

(14) "Handler" means any Washington winery, or processor, juicer, grape broker, agent, or person buying or receiving vinifera grapes to be passed on or exported either as grapes, juice, or wine.

[ 1988 c 257 s 6; 1987 c 452 s 2.]